Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2937
Waiver of members' meeting notice.

(1) A member may waive notice of any meeting of the members either before, during, or after the meeting.

(2) A member's participation in a meeting is waiver of notice of that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 37.